Hawaii statutes.
§431:11-108 Confidential treatment. (a)
Documents, materials, or other information in the possession or control of the
insurance division that are obtained by or disclosed to the commissioner or any
other person in the course of an examination or investigation made pursuant to
section 431:11-107 and all information reported pursuant to sections
431:11-104(b)(12) and (13), 431:11-105, and 431:11-106, shall be confidential
by law and privileged, shall not be disclosable under chapter 92F, shall not be
subject to subpoena, and shall not be subject to discovery or admissible in
evidence in any private civil action. The commissioner may use the documents,
materials, or other information in the furtherance of any regulatory or legal
action brought as part of the commissioner's official duties. The commissioner
shall not otherwise make the documents, materials, or other information public without
prior written consent of the insurer to which it pertains unless the
commissioner, after giving the insurer and its affiliates who would be affected
thereby notice and opportunity to be heard, determines that the interest of the
policyholders, shareholders, or the public will be served by the publication
thereof, in which event the commissioner may publish all or any part in such
manner as may be deemed appropriate.

(b) Neither the commissioner nor any person
who received documents, materials, or other information while acting under the
authority of the commissioner or with whom the documents, materials, or other
information are shared pursuant to this article shall be permitted or required
to testify in any private civil action concerning any confidential documents,
materials, or information subject to subsection (a).

(c) To assist in the performance of the
commissioner's duties, the commissioner:

(1) May share documents, materials, or other
information, including the confidential and privileged documents, materials, or
information subject to subsection (a), with other state, federal, and
international regulatory agencies, with the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and with state, federal, and
international law enforcement authorities, including members of any supervisory
college described in section 431:11-107.5; provided that the recipient agrees
in writing to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the
document, material, or other information, and has verified in writing the legal
authority to maintain confidentiality;

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) to the contrary,
may only share confidential and privileged documents, material, or information
reported pursuant to section 431:11-105(l) with commissioners of states having
statutes or regulations substantially similar to subsection (a) and who have agreed
in writing not to disclose such information;

(3) May receive documents, materials, or information,
including otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials, or
information from the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and its affiliates
and subsidiaries and from regulatory and law enforcement officials of other
foreign or domestic jurisdictions, and shall maintain as confidential or
privileged any document, material, or information received with notice or the
understanding that it is confidential or privileged under the laws of the
jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material, or information; and

(4) Shall enter into written agreements with the
National Association of Insurance Commissioners governing sharing and use of
information provided pursuant to this article and consistent with this
subsection that shall:

(A) Specify procedures and protocols
regarding the confidentiality and security of information shared with the
National Association of Insurance Commissioners and its affiliates and
subsidiaries pursuant to this article, including procedures and protocols for
sharing by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners with other
state, federal, or international regulators;

(B) Specify that ownership of information
shared with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and its
affiliates and subsidiaries pursuant to this article remains with and for use
by the commissioner and the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and
is subject to the direction of the commissioner;

(C) Require that prompt notice be given to an
insurer whose confidential information is in the possession of the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners pursuant to this article and require
that the insurer is subject to a request or subpoena from the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners for disclosure or production; and

(D) Require the National Association of
Insurance Commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries to consent to
intervention by an insurer in any judicial or administrative action in which
the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and its affiliates and
subsidiaries may be required to disclose confidential information about the
insurer shared pursuant to this article.

(d) The sharing of information by the
commissioner pursuant to this article shall not constitute a delegation of
regulatory authority or rulemaking, and the commissioner shall be solely
responsible for the administration, execution, and enforcement of this article.

(e) No waiver of any applicable privilege or
claim of confidentiality in the documents, materials, or information shall
occur as a result of disclosure to the commissioner under this section or as a
result of sharing as authorized in subsection (c).

(f) Documents, materials, or information in
the possession or control of the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners pursuant to this article shall be confidential by law and
privileged, shall not be disclosable under chapter 92F, shall not be subject to
subpoena, and shall not be subject to discovery or admissible in evidence in
any private civil action. [L 1987, c 349, pt of §8; am L 2014, c 234, §13]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next